South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3808.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 38-77-250(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Every insurer providing automobile insurance coverage in this State and which is or may be liable to pay all or a part of any claim shall provide, within thirty days of receiving a written request from the claimant's attorney, a statement, under oath, of a corporate officer or the insurer's claims manager stating with regard to each known policy of nonfleet private passenger insurance issued by it, the name of the insurer, the name of each insured, and the limits of coverage. The insurer may provide a copy of the declaration page of each such policy in lieu of providing such information. The request shall set forth under oath the specific nature of the claim asserted and shall be mailed to the insurer by  certified mail or statutory overnight delivery or sent by electronic mail or fax to the insurer. The request also must state that the attorney is authorized to make such a request and must be accompanied by a copy of the incident report or the South Carolina Department of Motor Vehicles Form FR-10 from which the claim is derived. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----